District of Columbia statutes.
19-602.02

Limitation on scope of subchapter.

This subchapter does not apply to:

(1)

An account established for a partnership, joint venture, or other organization for a business purpose;

(2)

An account controlled by one or more persons as an agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, or charitable or civic organization; or

(3)

A fiduciary or trust account in which the relationship is established other than by the terms of the account.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 202 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).